Utah statutes.
32A-1-107 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Powers and duties of the commission.
(1)  The commission shall:
(a)  act as a general policymaking body on the subject of alcoholic product
control;
(b)  adopt and issue policies, directives, rules, and procedures;
(c)  set policy by written rules that establish criteria and procedures for:
(i)  granting, denying, suspending, or revoking a permit, license, certificate
of approval, or package agency;
(ii)  controlling liquor merchandise inventory including:
(A)  listing and delisting a product;
(B)  the procedures for testing a new product;
(C)  purchasing policy;
(D)  turnover requirements for a regularly coded product to be continued; and
(E)  the disposition of discontinued, distressed, or unsaleable merchandise;
and
(iii)  determining the location of a state store, package agency, or outlet;
(d)  decide within the limits and under the conditions imposed by this title,
the number and location of state stores, package agencies, and outlets
established in the state;
(e)  issue, grant, deny, suspend, revoke, or not renew the following permits,
licenses, certificates of approval, and package agencies for the purchase,
sale, storage, service, manufacture, distribution, and consumption of an
alcoholic product:
(i)  a package agency;
(ii)  a restaurant license;
(iii)  an airport lounge license;
(iv)  a limited restaurant license;
(v)  an on-premise banquet license;
(vi)  a resort license, under which four or more sublicenses may be included;
(vii)  a club license;
(viii)  an on-premise beer retailer license;
(ix)  a temporary special event beer permit;
(x)  a special use permit;
(xi)  a single event permit;
(xii)  a manufacturing license;
(xiii)  a liquor warehousing license;
(xiv)  a beer wholesaling license; and
(xv)  an out-of-state brewer certificate of approval;
(f)  in accordance with Subsection (5), issue, grant, deny, suspend, or revoke
one of the following conditional licenses for the purchase, sale, storage,
service, manufacture, distribution, and consumption of an alcoholic product:
(i)  a conditional restaurant license; or
(ii)  a conditional limited restaurant license;
(g)  fix prices at which liquor is sold that are the same at all state stores,
package agencies, and outlets;
(h)  issue and distribute price lists showing the price to be paid by a
purchaser for each class, variety, or brand of liquor kept for sale by the
department;
(i) (i)  require the director to follow sound management principles; and
(ii)  require periodic reporting from the director to ensure that:
(A)  sound management principles are being followed; and
(B)  policies established by the commission are being observed;
(j) (i)  receive, consider, and act in a timely manner upon the reports,
recommendations, and matters submitted by the director to the commission; and
(ii)  do the things necessary to support the department in properly performing
the department's duties and responsibilities;
(k)  obtain temporarily and for special purposes the services of an expert or
person engaged in the practice of a profession or who possess any needed
skills, talents, or abilities if:
(i)  considered expedient; and
(ii)  approved by the governor;
(l)  prescribe the duties of a departmental official authorized to assist the
commission in issuing a permit, license, certificate of approval, or package
agency under this title;
(m)  prescribe, consistent with this title, the fees payable for:
(i)  a permit, license, certificate of approval, or package agency issued
under this title; or
(ii)  anything done or permitted to be done under this title;
(n)  prescribe the conduct, management, and equipment of a premise upon which
an alcoholic beverage may be sold, consumed, served, or stored;
(o)  make rules governing the credit terms of beer sales to retailers within
the state;
(p)  require that each of the following, where required in this title, display
in a prominent place a sign in large letters stating: "Warning: Driving under
the influence of alcohol or drugs is a serious crime that is prosecuted
aggressively in Utah.":
(i)  a state store;
(ii)  a permittee;
(iii)  a licensee; and
(iv)  a package agency; and
(q)  subject to Subsection (4) and as provided in this title, impose fines
against:
(i)  a permittee, licensee, certificate holder, or package agent described in
Subsection (1)(e); or
(ii)  an officer, employee, or agent of a permittee, licensee, certificate
holder, or package agent described in Subsection (1)(q)(i).
(2)  The power of the commission to do the following is plenary, except as
otherwise provided by this title, and not subject to review:
(a)  establish a state store;
(b)  create a package agency;
(c)  grant authority to operate a package agency; and
(d)  grant or deny a permit, license, or certificate of approval.
(3)  The commission may appoint a qualified hearing examiner to conduct a
suspension or revocation hearing required by law.
(4) (a)  In a case when the commission is given the power to suspend a permit,
license, certificate of approval, or package agency the commission may impose
a fine in addition to or in lieu of suspension.
(b)  A fine imposed may not exceed $25,000 in the aggregate for:
(i)  a single Notice of Agency Action; or
(ii)  a single action against a package agency.
(c)  The commission shall promulgate, by rule, a schedule setting forth a
range of fines for each violation.
(5) (a)  As used in this Subsection (5):
(i)  "Conditional license" means a license issued to a person that:
(A)  is for one of the following:
(I)  a restaurant license; or
(II)  a limited restaurant license; and
(B)  conditions the person's ability to sell or allow the consumption of an
alcoholic beverage on its premises on the person providing a copy of the
person's current business license before obtaining a valid license; and
(C)  provides that the person will be issued or granted a valid license if the
person complies with the requirements of Subsection (5)(c).
(ii)  "Valid license" means a license issued under Subsection (1)(f) under
which the person is permitted to sell or allow the consumption of an alcoholic
beverage on its premises.
(b)  Subject to the requirements of this Subsection (5), the commission may
grant a conditional license to a person if the person:
(i)  meets all of the requirements to obtain the license for which the person
is applying except the requirement to submit a copy of the applicant's current
business license; and
(ii)  agrees not to sell or allow the consumption of an alcoholic beverage on
its premises before obtaining a valid license.
(c) (i)  A conditional license becomes a valid license on the day on which the
department notifies the person who holds the conditional license that the
department finds that the person has complied with Subsection (5)(c)(ii).
(ii)  For a conditional license to become a valid license, a person who holds
the conditional license shall:
(A)  submit to the department a copy of the person's current business license;
and
(B)  provide to the department evidence satisfactory to the department that:
(I)  there has been no change in the information provided to the commission as
part of the person's application for a license; and
(II)  the person continues to qualify for the license.
(d)  A conditional license expires six months after the day on which the
commission issues or grants the license, unless it becomes a valid license
before that day.
